Utah statutes.
17-53-224.   Rewards for information -- Law enforcement -- Protection of county property.

(1) (a)  A county legislative body may appropriate funds from the county treasury for the offering and payment of rewards for information which directly assists in the enforcement of law and protection of county property.

(b)  The offering and payment of rewards shall be made under conditions and limitations as established by the county legislative body.

(2)  With the prior approval of the county legislative body, any county officer or agency may offer rewards to the same extent and for the same purposes authorized by Subsection (1).



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 133, 2000 General Session

